Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Organization
154.12-2086.
Skills training investment credit — Department of Revenue certification.

The Bluegrass State Skills Corporation may, in accordance with KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089, award a credit against the Kentucky tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and KRS 141.0401, to an approved company. The amount of the skills training investment credit awarded by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation shall be an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the amount of approved costs incurred by the approved company in connection with its program of occupational upgrade training or skills upgrade training, the credit amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per employee and, in the aggregate, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each approved company per biennium. The Bluegrass State Skills Corporation shall only approve one (1) application per biennium for each qualified company.

The skills training investment credit shall be credited on the tax return of the approved company filed for the fiscal year during which the final authorizing resolution is adopted by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation in accordance with KRS 154.12-2088(6). The skill training investment credits allowed under KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089 shall only be used by the approved company that has been awarded the credits in accordance with KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089. The skills training investment credits provided for in this section shall be applied to both the income tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, with the ordering of the credits as provided in KRS 141.0205. These credits shall be in addition to all other tax credits granted under the laws of the Commonwealth.

The skills training investment credits may be carried forward for three (3) successive fiscal years of the approved company if the amount allowable as credits exceeds the income tax liability of the approved company in the tax year during which the final authorizing resolution is adopted by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation; however, thereafter, if the amount allowable as credits exceeds the income tax liability of the approved company, the excess credits shall not be refundable or carried forward to any other fiscal year of the approved company for which a tax return of the approved company is to be filed.

A qualified company shall not be entitled to receive the skills training investment credits if the qualified company requires that the employee reimburse the employer or otherwise pay for any costs or expenses incurred in connection with the occupational upgrade training or skills upgrade training.

To the extent that any expenditures of a qualified company constitute approved costs and are the basis for the skills training investment credits under KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089, these expenditures shall not be eligible as the basis for grants-in-aid under Bluegrass State Skills Corporation provisions in KRS 154.12-204 to 154.12-208 or the Local Government Economic Development Program under the provisions of KRS 42.4588 to 42.4595.

Priority consideration for preliminary approval under KRS 154.12-2088 shall be given to qualified companies that the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation determines to be high performance companies. A minimum of thirty percent (30%) of the total skills training investment credits authorized by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation during any fiscal year shall be awarded to qualified companies that have been designated as high performance companies by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation. The Bluegrass State Skills Corporation shall establish guidelines and standards for the designation of high performance companies.

By October 1 of each year, the Department of Revenue shall certify to the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation the amount of any skills training investment credits taken pursuant to KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089 on tax returns filed during the fiscal year ending June 30 of that year.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 499, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 300, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 569, effective June 20, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 41, effective June 28, 2006.

154.12-2087.
Skills training investment credits — Applications not accepted after July 14, 2018 — Projects approved and outstanding as of July 14, 2018, continue to be governed by KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089.

The Bluegrass State Skills Corporation shall not accept applications for skills training investment credits described in KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089 after July 14, 2018. All outstanding projects with preliminary or final approval under KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089 as of July 14, 2018, shall continue to be governed by those provisions.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 199, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

154.12-2088.
Guidelines — Application — Preliminary approval — Final authorizing resolution.

The Bluegrass State Skills Corporation shall establish guidelines and standards for approving skills training investment credits for occupational upgrade training and skills upgrade training. The guidelines and standards may include, but are not limited to: required hours of classroom instruction; required courses; certification of teachers or instructors, whether independent contractors or employees of a qualified company; certification of providers; progressive levels of instruction; and standardized measures of employee evaluation to determine successful completion of a course of study.

To apply for skills training investment credits under KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089, a qualified company shall submit an application to the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation before commencing its program of occupational upgrade training or skills upgrade training. The application submitted by the qualified company shall contain information the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation requires including, but not limited to:

A proposal for a program of occupational upgrade training or skills upgrade training;

A description of each component of the proposed training program and the number of employee training hours requested;

A statement of all anticipated costs and expenses of the training program, including the costs and expenses associated with employee wages, equipment, personnel, facilities, and materials; and

Auditing procedures and reporting methods for the submission of information and data to the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.

After a review of applications for skills training investment credits, the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation may designate the qualified company as a preliminarily approved company and preliminarily approve the amount of skills training investment credits that the qualified company shall be eligible to receive. The maximum amount of skills training investment credits preliminarily approved for all qualified companies by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation for fiscal year 1998-1999 and fiscal year 1999-2000 shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) and shall not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) for each fiscal year thereafter. Skills training investment credits shall be allocated to qualified companies in the same order preliminary approval is granted by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation. Skills training investment credits that remain unallocated by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation at the end of its fiscal year shall lapse and shall not be carried forward to a new fiscal year.

The preliminarily approved company shall complete all programs of occupational upgrade training or skills upgrade training within one (1) year from the date of the preliminary approval of the skills training investment credits by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation and shall certify the completion of these programs to the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.

The preliminarily approved company shall maintain in its employment the employees receiving occupational upgrade or skills upgrade training for a minimum of ninety (90) days following the completion of the program of occupational upgrade training or skills upgrade training and shall certify to the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation the number of employees who remained in the employment of the preliminarily approved company for the full ninety (90) day period.

If a qualified company concludes its training program within the prescribed one (1) year and receives the required certifications described in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, then the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation shall adopt a final authorizing resolution approving the amount of skills training investment credits awarded to the preliminarily approved company in accordance with KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089. The adoption of a final authorizing resolution shall be contingent upon the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation’s approval of documentation submitted by the preliminarily approved company supporting all incurred approved costs. If one (1) or more of the employees of the preliminarily approved company failed to continue in the employment of the company for ninety (90) days following the completion of the prescribed one (1) year, then the amount of the skills training investment credits preliminarily approved for a qualified company shall be reduced on a pro rata basis for each employee who failed to continue employment with the preliminarily approved company through the ninety (90) day period. The final amount of the skills training investment credits awarded to the approved company shall not exceed the amount of skills training investment credits that the approved company was preliminarily approved for by the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation prior to commencement of the training program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 499, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 300, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

154.12-2089.
Short title for KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089.

KRS 154.12-2084 to 154.12-2089 may be cited as the “Skills Training Investment Credit Act.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 499, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

154.12-209.
Department for Existing Business and Industry — Divisions — Business Information Clearinghouse. [Repealed.]

154.12-210.
Cabinet’s duties in assembling and disseminating information about economic development.

The cabinet shall assemble and keep in the offices of the cabinet information relating to natural resources, industrial sites, labor supply, water, fuel, power, wage rates, taxation and assessments, transportation and communication facilities, and any other information that may be useful in executing the provisions of KRS 154.12-210 to 154.12-212. This information shall be made available to any enterprise which, in the discretion of the secretary, is legitimate and which contemplates location or operation within the Commonwealth. The information shall, in the discretion of the secretary, be made available to any governmental or private agency interested in securing the location or operation of any legitimate enterprise within the Commonwealth.

The cabinet shall obtain from enterprises interested in locating and operating within the Commonwealth information relating to the nature of the enterprise, its financial responsibility, manpower requirements, probable consumption of raw materials, and any other information that may be useful in securing the location of such enterprise in the Commonwealth.

The cabinet shall be the primary industrial and commercial development agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky in matters relating to the private sector of the state’s economy. The cabinet shall carry out programs relating to industrial and commercial development, research and planning, community and industrial services, marketing development, small and minority business enterprise, international trade and reverse investment, and other programs designated by the board.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 33, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 499, § 13, effective July 15, 1994.

154.12-211.
Cabinet to prepare and publish maps, surveys, directories, and studies.

The cabinet shall prepare and publish, or cause to be prepared and published, maps, economic and industrial resources surveys of the state and of individual communities and areas, directories of manufacturers, exporters, and industrial services, surveys as related to natural resources and industrial and commercial needs, studies of agri-business opportunities, surveys of forestry industries potential, studies of industrial site characteristics, and other matters relating to the economic development of the Commonwealth as it shall deem necessary and advisable.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 34, effective July 14, 1992.

154.12-212.
Energy resource information.

The cabinet shall be responsible for energy resource information. The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development may enter into a contractual agreement between the cabinet and the Kentucky Geological Survey and any other organizations deemed necessary in order to perform this function.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 35, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 499, § 14, effective July 15, 1994.

154.12-213.
Consultation with governmental agencies, studies and projections, development offices, and promotional advertising by cabinet.

The cabinet, as it deems necessary and advisable, may:

Consult with agencies of the state, federal, and local government in order to coordinate development programs and plans and to articulate agriculture, industry, and commerce in the light of the needs of particular localities;

Make studies of land utilization so as to determine areas suitable for industrial and commercial development;

Make studies and projections and publish information relating to the economic development of the Commonwealth and make appropriate recommendations to the board and the General Assembly;

Establish and maintain development offices in out-of-state centers of industrial and commercial management;

Place advertising in appropriate media promoting Kentucky’s resources and locational advantages for industrial and commercial enterprises.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 69, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 499, § 15, effective July 15, 1994.

154.12-214.
Definitions for KRS 154.12-215 to 154.12-220. [Repealed.]

154.12-215.
Duties of Department for Existing Business Development. [Repealed.]

154.12-216.
Business Information Clearinghouse Program — Duties. [Repealed.]

154.12-217.
Licensing coordinators. [Repealed.]

154.12-218.
Small Business Advisory Council. [Repealed.]

154.12-219.
General business license. [Repealed.]

154.12-220.
Administrative regulations — Licensing authority. [Repealed.]

154.12-221.
Master application and licensure program for new grocery store operations. [Repealed.]

154.12-222.
Office of Administration and Support. [Repealed.]

154.12-223.
Department for Business Development.

There is created within the Cabinet for Economic Development the Department for Business Development, which shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor. The department shall work with each Kentucky county in:

Providing customer service and project management with new and existing industries;

Overseeing programs and initiatives designed to support new investment, job creation, and retention across the state;

Providing sufficient technical resources to create and maintain a database to facilitate sales transactions between Kentucky businesses; and

Administering activities related to business site selection.

The following programs shall be attached to the Department for Business Development:

The Kentucky port and river development program created by KRS 65.510 to 65.530, KRS 139.483, and KRS 154.80-100 to 154.80-130; and

The Waterway Marina Development Program established by KRS 154.80-310.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 499, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 113, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 209, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 133, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 158, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 181, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2014, ch. 89, § 4, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 37, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

154.12-224.
Department for Financial Services.

There is created in the Cabinet for Economic Development the Department for Financial Services. The department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 154.10-050. The department shall coordinate administration and monitoring of all financial assistance, tax credit, and related programs available for business and industry and shall provide all budgeting, accounting, personnel services, and information technology necessary for proper administration of the cabinet and cabinet programs.

The department shall include the following divisions, each of which shall be headed by a director appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 12.050:

The Finance and Personnel Division, which shall provide financial, personnel, facility, and contract administration services;

The Compliance Division, which shall monitor incentives and collect and maintain data on incentives after they are awarded;

The Incentive Administration Division, which shall coordinate necessary documentation and assist the Department for Business Development in preparing recommendations and finalizing documents for presentation to the authority or other body for consideration and approval; and

The IT and Resource Management Division, which shall coordinate facility services and internal information technology needs.

The department shall include the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.

The department shall include the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation established by KRS 154.12-205.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 499, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 263, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 414, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 230, § 14, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 168, § 47, effective March 18, 2005; 2014, ch. 89, § 5, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 37, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

154.12-225.
Department for New Business Development — Duties. [Repealed.]

154.12-230.
Any cabinet program to support flexible networks to include workforce training.

Any Cabinet for Economic Development program or initiative to support flexible networks shall include workforce training as an eligible flexible networks activity.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 487, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

154.12-2333.
Kentucky Investment Capital Network. [Repealed.]

154.12-240.
Regulatory Expediting Center.

The Regulatory Expediting Center is established within the cabinet to assist industries and businesses proposing to locate or expand existing operations in Kentucky with applications for permits, licenses, certificates, registration, and any other form of authorization or permit required by a state, federal, or local agency to engage in a particular business activity or act.

The center shall train and deploy persons with knowledge and skills essential to expediting a request for assistance by a prospective or expanding business or industry with applications for permits, licenses, certificates, registration, and any other form of authorization required by a state, federal, or local governmental agency to engage in a particular business activity or act.

Assistance given by the center regarding federal and local regulations and requirements necessary to engage in the proposed business activity or act shall be limited to providing the business or industrial entity with copies of application forms and other written information provided by the appropriate federal and local agencies.

Priority shall be given to business or industrial development or expansion proposals by businesses or industrial entities participating in an approved business network.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 390, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 2014, ch. 89, § 7, effective July 15, 2014.

154.12-250.
Kentucky Coal Council — Office of Coal Marketing and Export. [Repealed.]

154.12-252.
Membership of council — Reimbursement of expenses — Meetings — Quorum. [Repealed.]

154.12-255.
Duties of council. [Repealed.]

154.12-260.
Department for Coal County Development — Purpose — Appointment of commissioner. [Repealed.]

154.12-265.
Department for Regional Development — Purpose — Appointment of commissioner. [Repealed.]

154.12-270.
Cabinet to undertake strategic technology capacity initiative and study — Study results. [Repealed.]

154.12-274.
Legislative intent — Requirement that cabinet support modernization, increase, and improvement in the Commonwealth’s production process — Cabinet to contract with Kentucky Manufacturing Assistance Center.

As used in this section, “cluster” shall have the same meaning as in KRS 164.6011.

It is the intention of the General Assembly to recognize that a strong manufacturing base for the economy of the Commonwealth requires not only modernization of the production process but also an increase in the number of products developed, so that through the creation of new product lines, additional value-added products, and new manufacturing methods the economy will grow and quality job opportunities will increase. The Cabinet for Economic Development shall support this intention through its authority in KRS 154.12-050.

The Cabinet for Economic Development shall enter into contracts or agreements with the Kentucky Manufacturing Assistance Center, a nonprofit organization with the mission to assist Kentucky small and medium-size manufacturers to become more competitive in the global marketplace. The contracts or agreements shall require the Kentucky Manufacturing Assistance Center to undertake the following activities:

Negotiate contractual agreements with existing manufacturers to deliver modernization services that are likely to lead to the creation of new product lines, additional value-added products, and new manufacturing methods;

Deliver engineering, technical, and business improvement services in Kentucky manufacturing facilities, through the network of Kentucky Technology Service locations in the state, that lead to the development of new product lines, additional value-added products, and new manufacturing methods;

Coordinate services for and support the activities of Kentucky manufacturers that need additional projects, activities, and expertise beyond those available through the Kentucky Manufacturing Assistance Center;

Promote, along with other economic development entities, the development of supplier chains, the linkages among suppliers, and the growth of clusters within the Commonwealth; and

Provide to the Cabinet for Economic Development a report of the advances made in the manufacturing modernization projects initiated.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 522, § 19, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 230, § 15, effective July 15, 2002; 2017 ch. 80, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

154.12-275.
Office of Marketing and Public Affairs — Executive director — Duties of office — Communications Division — Graphics Design Division.

There is created in the Cabinet for Economic Development the Office of Marketing and Public Affairs. The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 154.10-050. The office shall administer activities related to communications and marketing services.

The office shall include the following divisions, each of which shall be headed by a director appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 12.050:

The Communications Division; and

The Graphics Design Division.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 37, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

154.12-276.
Office of Workforce, Community Development, and Research — Executive director — Duties of office.

There is created in the Cabinet for Economic Development the Office of Workforce, Community Development, and Research. The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 154.10-050. The office shall administer programs to ensure that communities and workers in the Commonwealth are equipped with resources, superior training, and skills needed to compete in the global economy and partner with appropriate organizations to ensure that companies and individuals receive the resources they need to be successful. The office shall also administer research activities related to strategic planning, business site selection, existing business development, program analysis, competitive analysis, and community development.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 37, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

154.12-277.
Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation — Executive director — Duties of office — Inclusion of Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.

There is created in the Cabinet for Economic Development the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation. The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 154.10-050. The office shall be responsible for various forms of entrepreneurship and small business assistance, including but not limited to providing customer service and project management with small and minority businesses, assisting export development, administering the innovation assistance set forth in KRS 154.12-278, introducing entrepreneurs to individual investors and to investment capital firms interested in start-up and early-stage financing, and collecting, summarizing, and disseminating information helpful to small businesses, including information on market research, federal, state, and local minority business programs, government procurement opportunities, and the availability of managerial assistance.

The office shall include the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy established in KRS 11.200.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 37, § 7, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 105, effective June 29, 2021.

154.12-278.
Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation — Duties of office and executive director — High-tech construction pool and high-tech investment pool — Duties of Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.

As used in this section, “cluster” and “knowledge-based” shall have the same meaning as in KRS 164.6011.

The Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation shall:

Implement the Kentucky Innovation and Commercialization Center Program as set forth in KRS 154.12-300 to 154.12-310;

Monitor the return on investments and effectiveness of the Kentucky Innovation Act initiatives as set forth in the Strategic Plan for the New Economy and prepare an annual report by November 1 of each year. The report shall be available on the Cabinet for Economic Development Web page as required by KRS 154.12-2035;

Oversee the modernization initiative in KRS 154.12-274;

Assist the cabinet in the recruitment of research and development companies;

Assist the cabinet in the attraction of high-technology research and development centers;

Support growth and creation of knowledge-based, innovative companies;

Build the infrastructure for innovative businesses and promote networks of technology-driven clusters and research intensive industries;

Administer the high-tech construction pool and the high-tech investment pool;

Recommend projects to the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority for funding through the high-tech construction pool and high-tech investment pool; and

Review and approve the annual plan which details the annual allocation of funds from the Science and Technology Funding Program. As used in this paragraph, the Science and Technology Funding Program means the Kentucky enterprise fund, the Rural Innovation Program, the Kentucky Commercialization Program, The Regional Technology Corporations/Innovation and Commercialization Center Satellites, the Experimental Program to Stimulate Competitive Research/Kentucky Science and Engineering Foundation, Small Business Innovation Research and Small Business Technology Transfer grants, and other government grant programs and funding programs as determined by the executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation.

The high-tech construction pool shall be used for projects with a special emphasis on the creation of high-technology jobs and knowledge-based companies. The executive director, in administering the high-tech construction pool, shall recommend distribution of funds and projects to the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority for its approval. The executive director shall recommend any designated amount of pool funds to be set aside for any match requirements. Any funds used for matching purposes may include public and private funds.

The high-tech investment pool shall be used to build and promote technology-driven industries and research-intensive industries, as well as their related suppliers, with the goal of creating clusters of innovation-driven industries in Kentucky. The executive director, in administering the high-tech investment pool, shall be authorized to recommend funds to be used to support loans and grants, or to secure an equity or related position.

The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority shall ensure in their approval of funding of projects that the highest priority is given to knowledge-based companies in fulfillment of the purposes and intentions of the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 522, § 20, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 230, § 16, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 181, § 10, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 210, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 98, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 89, § 6, effective July 15, 2014; ch. 134, § 6, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 80, § 7, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 199, § 16, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 106, effective June 29, 2021.

154.12-300.
Definitions for KRS 154.12-300 to 154.12-310.

As used in KRS 154.12-300 to 154.12-310, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Affiliate” means an ICC identified as the headquarters for program activity in a region or subregion;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Commercialization and Innovation established in KRS 154.12-278;

“ICC” means the Kentucky Innovation and Commercialization Center;

“Region” means a geographic area of Kentucky designated as having a unique innovation strategic plan by the Department of Commercialization and Innovation; and

“Satellite” means an office of an affiliate in a region.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 181, § 11, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 210, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 98, § 8, effective July 15, 2008.

154.12-305.
Kentucky Innovation and Commercialization Center Program.

There is established the Kentucky Innovation and Commercialization Center Program within the Department of Commercialization and Innovation. The goal of the ICC program is to create products, new companies, and value-added jobs in communities throughout the Commonwealth. Strategies to achieve this goal include:

Increasing quality deal flow of technology-based firms in Kentucky;

Increasing understanding of start-up process and investment practices; and

Providing value-added services to the start-up and investment community.

The duties of the ICC program shall include but not be limited to:

Identifying and linking entrepreneurs, faculty, scientists, venture capitalists, and other key individuals from the business sector, universities, community and technical colleges, local leaders, and government for the creation and expansion of knowledge-based companies;

Establishing a uniform protocol for assembling and communicating project concepts and opportunities;

Supporting high-quality projects through the concept and development phases including services such as market research, prototype development, business plan and strategies development, grant and contract capabilities, and capital and management resource identification; and

Identifying, in the area of technology development, potential partners, strategic opportunities, training and educational needs, and issues that inhibit the growth of technology sectors and business clusters in the state.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 10, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 181, § 12, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 210, § 8, effective July 12, 2006.

154.12-310.
Kentucky Innovation and Commercialization Centers — Organization — Powers and duties of executive director of Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation.

The Kentucky Innovation and Commercialization Centers are private-public partnerships, operating as a cohesive statewide infrastructure to support the implementation of key Kentucky Innovation Act initiatives.

The organization of the ICCs shall be a statewide network of Kentucky innovative hubs, with the location and services provided for each hub determined by the executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation.

The Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation shall be the central headquarters for the Kentucky innovative hubs and has primary responsibility for the following:

Managing and administering the ICC Program;

Establishing uniform program application, protocol, and operating guidelines when appropriate;

Supporting the protocol by creating and funding centralized services to be distributed throughout the network; and

Identifying those issues, opportunities, and challenges that have statewide implications.

The regional affiliates are responsible for fulfilling the duties as set forth in KRS 154.12-305 relating to the implementation of the region’s innovation strategic plan and supporting the implementation of the Kentucky Innovation Act initiatives in the region or subregion;

The satellites are responsible for generating technology business development in their assigned geographic area, acting as a bridge between individuals and businesses needing critical early state concept and development work and the affiliate centers that can provide this support.

The executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation shall have all the powers and authority, not explicitly prohibited by statute, necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes of KRS 154.12-300 to 154.12-310.

The executive director of the Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation may, in effectuating the provisions of KRS 154.12-300 to 154.12-310, contract with a science and technology organization as defined in KRS 164.6011 to administer and manage the ICC Program.

The affiliates and satellites provide a valuable assurance for equal access to the Kentucky Innovation Act initiatives and funding, and provide an opportunity for full participation in rural and remote, as well as metropolitan, areas of the state.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 11, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 98, § 9, effective July 15, 2008; 2018 ch. 199, § 17, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 107, effective June 29, 2021.

154.12-315.
Concept phase funding pool. [Repealed.]

154.12-320.
Kentucky Science and Engineering Foundation.

The Kentucky Science and Technology Corporation shall administer and manage the Kentucky Science and Engineering Foundation as a means to increase Kentucky’s capacity to become a leader state in competitive research by attracting more research funding from all sources to the Commonwealth. The Kentucky Science and Engineering Foundation shall be modeled in part on the National Science Foundation and shall make its own investments in peer-reviewed science and engineering research, to accelerate the rate of research and development funds and work to increase the amount of federal and private sector funds for this work in Kentucky.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 230, § 13, effective July 15, 2002.

154.12-325.
Definitions for KRS 154.12-325 and 154.12-330.

As used in KRS 154.12-325 and 154.12-330:

“Affiliate” has the same meaning as provided in KRS 154.22-010(2);

“Full-time employee” means a person employed for a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week and subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020;

“Service or technology” has the same meaning as provided in KRS 154.24-010(19) and shall include regional or headquarters operations of an entity engaged in the defined activities, but shall not include work involving direct service to the public pursuant to a license issued by the state or an association that issues licenses in lieu of the state; and

“Small business” means any business entity organized for profit, including a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited partnership, corporation, limited liability company, joint venture, association, or cooperative, that has fifty (50) or fewer full-time employees at the time it applies for a loan under KRS 154.12-330 and is not an affiliate or subsidiary of a larger corporate structure, unless the total number of employees of all the affiliates and subsidiaries within that structure is fifty (50) or fewer.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 158, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 149, § 212, effective July 12, 2006.

154.12-330.
Authorization to develop and fund small business loan program — $100,000 limit — Requirements.

The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority is hereby authorized to develop and fund a small business loan program to assist new or existing small businesses operating in the Commonwealth. The authority may lend up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to any eligible small business for acquisition, construction, expansion, working capital, or any other business expense the authority deems reasonable to approve.

The authority shall determine the terms, conditions, and requirements for loans issued under this section, including collateral requirements when deemed reasonable and appropriate. Recognizing that small businesses, while essential for the economic vitality of the Commonwealth, may have difficulty obtaining conventional loans, the authority may provide terms that are more lenient, high-risk, less secure, or otherwise less stringent than industry standards.

To be eligible for a loan under this section, a small business shall be engaged in manufacturing, agribusiness, or service or technology, shall not be engaged primarily in retail, and shall commit to creating and maintaining at least one (1) new full-time job above the number existing on the date of application.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 158, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.